Colorado statutes. TITLE 25.5 Health Care Policy and Financing
PART 8
MEDICAID NONMEDICAL AND
NONEMERGENCY MEDICAL TRANSPORTATION

25.5-1-801. Definitions.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Nonemergency medical transportation" means transportation to or from medically necessary nonemergency treatment.

"Nonmedical transportation" means transportation to enable passengers who are recipients of medicaid to gain access to waiver and other community services, activities, and resources.

"Transportation broker" means an entity designated by the department of health care policy and financing to administer nonemergency medical transportation.

"Transportation provider" means an individual or business entity, other than a transportation broker, that:

Provides transportation services; or

Arranges the facilitation of transportation services by an individual.

"Transportation services" means nonemergency medical transportation or nonmedical transportation services provided to medicaid recipients.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire part added, (HB 21-1206), ch. 381, p. 2551, § 1, effective June 29.

25.5-1-802. Medicaid transportation services - safety and oversight - rules.

The state department shall collaborate with stakeholders, including but not limited to disability and member advocates, PACE providers operating pursuant to section 25.5-5-412, transportation brokers, and transportation providers, to establish rules and processes for the safety and oversight of nonmedical transportation services and nonemergency medical transportation services provided to medicaid recipients pursuant to articles 4 to 6 of this title 25.5. The rules and processes must:

Ensure the safety of passengers;

Protect passenger access to transportation services; and

Establish driver and vehicle requirements that minimize financial and administrative burdens for transportation providers, direct support professionals as defined in section 25.5-6-406, long-term care direct care workers, independent contractors, and employees providing transportation services.

To the extent possible, the state department shall use existing oversight procedures to ensure compliance with the requirements as described in subsection (1) of this section.

If a provider of transportation services already complies with transportation safety standards established by another state department which meet or exceed the rules and processes established pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, demonstrating such compliance to the state department is sufficient to verify compliance with the requirements of this section.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire part added, (HB 21-1206), ch. 381, p. 2552, § 1, effective June 29.